Louisiana, session 2026, SB497.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 40:2009.26 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§2009.26. Evacuation protocols; licensed facilities
During an emergency, the Louisiana Department of Health shall notify
a facility licensed by the department of any evacuation or emergency
management response required for the facility. If the notification is made orally,
the department shall also provide the information to the facility by electronic
mail.
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1135 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 497